test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ress_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ress e~a-stem: # Noun 'switch/risu' - full paradigm
     reʹss+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: reʹss
     reʹss+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: reeʹss
     reʹss+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: reeʹss
     reʹss+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ressa
     reʹss+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: reeʹssest
     reʹss+N+Sg+Com+Indef: riiʹssin
     reʹss+N+Ess+Indef: reʹssen
     reʹss+N+Par+Indef: reʹssed
     reʹss+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [reeʹsstaa, reeʹsstää]
     reʹss+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: reeʹss
     reʹss+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: riiʹssi
     reʹss+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: riiʹssid
     reʹss+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: riiʹssid
     reʹss+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: riiʹssin
     reʹss+N+Pl+Com+Indef: riiʹssivuiʹm
     reʹss+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [riiʹssitaa, riiʹssitää]
